District of Columbia statutes.
20-913

Repealed

Contingent claim.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3, 42 DCR 63
1981 Ed., § 20-913.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-905.